Utah statutes.
10-7-71.   Corporate violation -- Summons -- Time and manner of service.
The summons and copy of complaint must be served at least twenty-four hours
before the hour of appearance fixed therein by delivering to and leaving a
copy thereof with the president or other head of the corporation, or the
secretary, the cashier, or the managing or process agent thereof, and by
showing to him the original summons.
